California, session 20252026, SB486.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) According to the Governor’s Council for Post-Secondary Education, “In California, a bachelor’s degree yields higher wages, increased full-time employment, and lower unemployment. Those with a bachelor’s degree are more likely to own a home, less likely to live in poverty, and more likely to be civically engaged. Demand for workers with post-secondary credentials [is] increasing in the vast majority of industries, including those that traditionally have not required post-secondary credentials.” Black and Latino graduates earn a median family income at least twice as high, with median family wealth nearly four times as high, as their counterparts without a university degree.(b) Due to a lack of sufficient classrooms, housing for students, faculty, and staff, lab space, and other academic and service facilities, the number of eligible, qualified California applicants denied admission to the public university campuses with the greatest demonstrated success in accelerating social mobility has climbed steadily, according to the Public Policy Institute of California.(c) Over the past 15 years, student demand and preparation outpaced enrollment forecast models, especially in urban areas home to both impacted universities and large underserved populations. Due in part to state investments in preschool, transitional kindergarten, and the local control funding formula, an increasing percentage of students are graduating from high school having met the rigorous admission requirements of California’s public universities. In 2007, one-third of California high school graduates completed the courses required for university admission. By 2017, nearly one-half did so.(d) The proportion of community college students eligible to transfer to the public universities is growing substantially, due in part to nearly $1,000,000,000 of state investment, the associate degree for transfer program, and developmental education policy reforms. The California Community Colleges intends to increase the number of students who transfer to the University of California or the California State University by 35 percent. The California State University has strengthened year-to-year student persistence and graduation.(e) One-fifth of California’s adult population, beyond the traditional pool of recent high school graduates, plans to go to college in the near future.(f) California Competes projects that California must increase degree production by 10 percent each year, compounded, in order to close the degree gap for more than 2,000,000 Californians.(g) Housing expenses constitute between one-half and two-thirds of students’ cost of attendance at public institutions of higher education. Students who struggle to afford and secure housing, particularly student parents, have poorer grades and experience delayed graduation and workforce entry. Between 2018 and 2022, off-campus housing costs increased by more than 30 percent, exacerbating the financial burden on students, faculty, and staff.(h) Enrolling students at higher densities at campuses with access to high-quality transit and social and public services will reduce vehicle trips and maximize climate, environmental, public health, and economic benefits. In addition, according to the Public Policy Institute of California, “prioritizing the expansion of existing high-demand campuses ... would be the most efficient way of allocating limited resources.”(i) The success of regional sustainable communities strategies and alternative planning strategies in achieving necessary reductions in emissions of greenhouse gases and vehicle miles traveled depends on coordination with, and compliance by, public universities with those plans.(j) A legacy of redlining and exclusionary zoning has resulted in many of the public university campuses constrained by the most severe capacity limitation being located in communities that block expanding access to the universities they host.(k) The longstanding policy of the State of California, as set forth in Section 66201 of the Education Code, is that “each resident of California who has the capacity and motivation to benefit from higher education should have the opportunity to enroll in an institution of higher education. Once enrolled, each individual should have the opportunity to continue as long and as far as [their] capacity and motivation, as indicated by academic performance and commitment to educational advancement, will lead [them] to meet academic standards and institutional requirements.”(l) The number of seats open for admission or transfer to California’s institutions of public higher education is a matter of statewide concern and is not a discretionary action by individual campuses or local jurisdictions. Section 66202.5 of the Education Code directs the University of California and the California State University to plan so that “adequate spaces are available to accommodate all California resident students who are eligible and likely to apply” and requires the State of California to commit resources to accommodate those students.(m) Coordination and consistency between long-range development plans of institutions of public higher education and the sustainable communities strategies and alternative planning strategies of the regions in which they are located maximizes environmental, climate, public health, housing, workforce, and economic benefits.SEC. 2. Section 65080 of the Government Code is amended to read:65080. (a) Each transportation planning agency designated under Section 29532 or 29532.1 shall prepare and adopt a regional transportation plan directed at achieving a coordinated and balanced regional transportation system, including, but not limited to, mass transportation, highway, railroad, maritime, bicycle, pedestrian, goods movement, and aviation facilities and services. The plan shall be action-oriented and pragmatic, considering both the short-term and long-term future, and shall present clear, concise policy guidance to local and state officials. The regional transportation plan shall consider factors specified in Section 134 of Title 23 of the United States Code. Each transportation planning agency shall consider and incorporate, as appropriate, the transportation plans of cities, counties, districts, private organizations, and state and federal agencies.(b) The regional transportation plan shall be an internally consistent document and shall include all of the following:(1) A policy element that describes the transportation issues in the region, identifies and quantifies regional needs, and describes the desired short-range and long-range transportation goals, and pragmatic objective and policy statements. The objective and policy statements shall be consistent with the funding estimates of the financial element. The policy element of transportation planning agencies with populations that exceed 200,000 persons may quantify a set of indicators, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Measures of mobility and traffic congestion, including, but not limited to, daily vehicle hours of delay per capita and vehicle miles traveled per capita.(B) Measures of road and bridge maintenance and rehabilitation needs, including, but not limited to, roadway pavement and bridge conditions.(C) Measures of means of travel, including, but not limited to, percentage share of all trips (work and nonwork) made by all of the following:(i) Single-occupant vehicle.(ii) Multiple occupant vehicle or carpool.(iii) Public transit including commuter rail and intercity rail.(iv) Walking.(v) Bicycling.(D) Measures of safety and security, including, but not limited to, total injuries and fatalities assigned to each of the modes set forth in subparagraph (C).(E) Measures of equity and accessibility, including, but not limited to, percentage of the population served by frequent and reliable public transit, with a breakdown by income bracket, and percentage of all jobs accessible by frequent and reliable public transit service, with a breakdown by income bracket.(F) The requirements of this section may be met using existing sources of information. No additional traffic counts, household surveys, or other sources of data shall be required.(2) A sustainable communities strategy prepared by each metropolitan planning organization as follows:(A) No later than September 30, 2010, the State Air Resources Board shall provide each affected region with greenhouse gas emission reduction targets for the automobile and light truck sector for 2020 and 2035, respectively.(i) No later than January 31, 2009, the State Air Resources Board shall appoint a Regional Targets Advisory Committee to recommend factors to be considered and methodologies to be used for setting greenhouse gas emission reduction targets for the affected regions. The committee shall be composed of representatives of the metropolitan planning organizations, affected air districts, the League of California Cities, the California State Association of Counties, local transportation agencies, and members of the public, including homebuilders, environmental organizations, planning organizations, environmental justice organizations, affordable housing organizations, and others. The advisory committee shall transmit a report with its recommendations to the State Air Resources Board no later than September 30, 2009. In recommending factors to be considered and methodologies to be used, the advisory committee may consider any relevant issues, including, but not limited to, data needs, modeling techniques, growth forecasts, the impacts of regional jobs-housing balance on interregional travel and greenhouse gas emissions, economic and demographic trends, the magnitude of greenhouse gas reduction benefits from a variety of land use and transportation strategies, and appropriate methods to describe regional targets and to monitor performance in attaining those targets. The State Air Resources Board shall consider the report before setting the targets.(ii) Before setting the targets for a region, the State Air Resources Board shall exchange technical information with the metropolitan planning organization and the affected air district. The metropolitan planning organization may recommend a target for the region. The metropolitan planning organization shall hold at least one public workshop within the region after receipt of the report from the advisory committee. The State Air Resources Board shall release draft targets for each region no later than June 30, 2010.(iii) In establishing these targets, the State Air Resources Board shall take into account greenhouse gas emission reductions that will be achieved by improved vehicle emission standards, changes in fuel composition, and other measures it has approved that will reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases in the affected regions, and prospective measures the State Air Resources Board plans to adopt to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases from other greenhouse gas emission sources as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 38505 of the Health and Safety Code and consistent with the regulations adopted pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), including Section 38566 of the Health and Safety Code.(iv) The State Air Resources Board shall update the regional greenhouse gas emission reduction targets every eight years consistent with each metropolitan planning organization’s timeframe for updating its regional transportation plan under federal law until 2050. The State Air Resources Board may revise the targets every four years based on changes in the factors considered under clause (iii). The State Air Resources Board shall exchange technical information with the Department of Transportation, metropolitan planning organizations, local governments, and affected air districts and engage in a consultative process with public and private stakeholders, before updating these targets.(v) The greenhouse gas emission reduction targets may be expressed in gross tons, tons per capita, tons per household, or in any other metric deemed appropriate by the State Air Resources Board.(B) Each metropolitan planning organization shall prepare a sustainable communities strategy, subject to the requirements of Part 450 of Title 23 of, and Part 93 of Title 40 of, the Code of Federal Regulations, including the requirement to use the most recent planning assumptions considering local general plans and other factors. The sustainable communities strategy shall do all of the following:(i) Identify the general location of uses, residential densities, and building intensities within the region.(ii) Identify areas within the region sufficient to house all the population of the region, including all economic segments of the population, over the course of the planning period of the regional transportation plan taking into account net migration into the region, population growth, changes in enrollment levels at institutions of public higher education, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 66010 of the Education Code, household formation, and employment growth.(iii) Identify areas within the region sufficient to house an eight-year projection of the regional housing need for the region pursuant to Section 65584.(iv) Identify a transportation network to service the transportation needs of the region.(v) Gather and consider the best practically available scientific information regarding resource areas and farmland in the region as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 65080.01.(vi) Consider the state housing goals specified in Sections 65580 and 65581.(vii) Set forth a forecasted development pattern for the region, which, when integrated with the transportation network, and other transportation measures and policies, will reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases from automobiles and light trucks to achieve, if there is a feasible way to do so, the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets approved by the State Air Resources Board.(viii) Allow the regional transportation plan to comply with Section 176 of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7506).(C) (i) Within the jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, as defined by Section 66502, the Association of Bay Area Governments shall be responsible for clauses (i), (ii), (iii), (v), and (vi) of subparagraph (B); the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall be responsible for clauses (iv) and (viii) of subparagraph (B); and the Association of Bay Area Governments and the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall jointly be responsible for clause (vii) of subparagraph (B).(ii) Within the jurisdiction of the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency, as defined in Sections 66800 and 66801, the Tahoe Metropolitan Planning Organization shall use the Regional Plan for the Lake Tahoe Region as the sustainable communities strategy, provided that it complies with clauses (vii) and (viii) of subparagraph (B).(D) In the region served by the Southern California Association of Governments, a subregional council of governments and the county transportation commission may work together to propose the sustainable communities strategy and an alternative planning strategy, if one is prepared pursuant to subparagraph (I), for that subregional area. The metropolitan planning organization may adopt a framework for a subregional sustainable communities strategy or a subregional alternative planning strategy to address the intraregional land use, transportation, economic, air quality, and climate policy relationships. The metropolitan planning organization shall include the subregional sustainable communities strategy for that subregion in the regional sustainable communities strategy to the extent consistent with this section and federal law and approve the subregional alternative planning strategy, if one is prepared pursuant to subparagraph (I), for that subregional area to the extent consistent with this section. The metropolitan planning organization shall develop overall guidelines, create a public participation plan pursuant to subparagraph (F), ensure coordination, resolve conflicts, make sure that the overall plan complies with applicable legal requirements, and adopt the plan for the region.(E) The metropolitan planning organization shall conduct at least two informational meetings in each county within the region for members of the board of supervisors and city councils on the sustainable communities strategy and alternative planning strategy, if any. The metropolitan planning organization may conduct only one informational meeting if it is attended by representatives of the county board of supervisors and city council members representing a majority of the cities representing a majority of the population in the incorporated areas of that county. Notice of the meeting or meetings shall be sent to the clerk of the board of supervisors and to each city clerk. The purpose of the meeting or meetings shall be to discuss the sustainable communities strategy and the alternative planning strategy, if any, including the key land use and planning assumptions with the members of the board of supervisors and the city council members in that county and to solicit and consider their input and recommendations.(F) Each metropolitan planning organization shall adopt a public participation plan, for development of the sustainable communities strategy and an alternative planning strategy, if any, that includes all of the following:(i) Outreach efforts to encourage the active participation of a broad range of stakeholder groups in the planning process, consistent with the agency’s adopted Federal Public Participation Plan, including, but not limited to, affordable housing advocates, transportation advocates, neighborhood and community groups, environmental advocates, homebuilder representatives, broad-based business organizations, landowners, commercial property interests, and homeowner associations.(ii) Consultation with congestion management agencies, transportation agencies, and transportation commissions.(iii) Workshops throughout the region to provide the public with the information and tools necessary to provide a clear understanding of the issues and policy choices. At least one workshop shall be held in each county in the region. For counties with a population greater than 500,000, at least three workshops shall be held. Each workshop, to the extent practicable, shall include urban simulation computer modeling to create visual representations of the sustainable communities strategy and the alternative planning strategy.(iv) Preparation and circulation of a draft sustainable communities strategy and an alternative planning strategy, if one is prepared, not less than 55 days before adoption of a final regional transportation plan.(v) At least three public hearings on the draft sustainable communities strategy in the regional transportation plan and alternative planning strategy, if one is prepared. If the metropolitan transportation organization consists of a single county, at least two public hearings shall be held. To the maximum extent feasible, the hearings shall be in different parts of the region to maximize the opportunity for participation by members of the public throughout the region.(vi) A process for enabling members of the public to provide a single request to receive notices, information, and updates.(G) In preparing a sustainable communities strategy, the metropolitan planning organization shall consider spheres of influence that have been adopted by the local agency formation commissions within its region.(H) Before adopting a sustainable communities strategy, the metropolitan planning organization shall quantify the reduction in the emissions of greenhouse gases projected to be achieved by the sustainable communities strategy and set forth the difference, if any, between the amount of that reduction and the target for the region established by the State Air Resources Board.(I) If the sustainable communities strategy, prepared in compliance with subparagraph (B) or (D), is unable to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases to achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets established by the State Air Resources Board, the metropolitan planning organization shall prepare an alternative planning strategy to the sustainable communities strategy showing how those greenhouse gas emission reduction targets would be achieved through alternative development patterns, infrastructure, or additional transportation measures or policies. The alternative planning strategy shall be a separate document from the regional transportation plan, but it may be adopted concurrently with the regional transportation plan. In preparing the alternative planning strategy, the metropolitan planning organization:(i) Shall identify the principal impediments to achieving the targets within the sustainable communities strategy.(ii) May include an alternative development pattern for the region pursuant to subparagraphs (B) to (G), inclusive.(iii) Shall describe how the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets would be achieved by the alternative planning strategy, and why the development pattern, measures, and policies in the alternative planning strategy are the most practicable choices for achievement of the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets.(iv) An alternative development pattern set forth in the alternative planning strategy shall comply with Part 450 of Title 23 of, and Part 93 of Title 40 of, the Code of Federal Regulations, except to the extent that compliance will prevent achievement of the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets approved by the State Air Resources Board.(v) For purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), an alternative planning strategy shall not constitute a land use plan, policy, or regulation, and the inconsistency of a project with an alternative planning strategy shall not be a consideration in determining whether a project may have an environmental effect.(J) (i) Before starting the public participation process adopted pursuant to subparagraph (F), the metropolitan planning organization shall submit a description to the State Air Resources Board of the technical methodology it intends to use to estimate the emissions of greenhouse gases from its sustainable communities strategy and, if appropriate, its alternative planning strategy. The State Air Resources Board shall respond to the metropolitan planning organization in a timely manner with written comments about the technical methodology, including specifically describing any aspects of that methodology it concludes will not yield accurate estimates of the emissions of greenhouse gases and suggesting remedies. The metropolitan planning organization is encouraged to work with the State Air Resources Board until the State Air Resources Board concludes that the technical methodology operates accurately.(ii) After adoption, a metropolitan planning organization shall submit a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy, if one has been adopted, to the State Air Resources Board for review, including the quantification of the reductions of emissions of greenhouse gases the strategy would achieve and a description of the technical methodology used to obtain that result. Review by the State Air Resources Board shall be limited to acceptance or rejection of the metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the strategy submitted would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets established by the State Air Resources Board. The State Air Resources Board shall complete its review within 60 days.(iii) If the State Air Resources Board determines that the strategy submitted would not, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets, the metropolitan planning organization shall revise its strategy or adopt an alternative planning strategy, if not previously adopted, and submit the strategy for review pursuant to clause (ii). At a minimum, the metropolitan planning organization shall obtain State Air Resources Board acceptance that an alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets established for that region by the State Air Resources Board.(iv) On or before September 1, 2018, and every four years thereafter to align with target setting, notwithstanding Section 10231.5, the State Air Resources Board shall prepare a report that assesses progress made by each metropolitan planning organization in meeting the regional greenhouse gas emission reduction targets set by the State Air Resources Board. The report shall include changes to the emissions of greenhouse gases in each region and data-supported metrics for the strategies used to meet the targets. The report shall also include a discussion of best practices and the challenges faced by the metropolitan planning organizations in meeting the targets, including the effect of state policies and funding. The report shall be developed in consultation with the metropolitan planning organizations and affected stakeholders. The report shall be submitted to the Assembly Committee on Transportation and the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources, and to the Senate Committee on Transportation, the Senate Committee on Housing, and the Senate Committee on Environmental Quality.(K) Neither a sustainable communities strategy nor an alternative planning strategy regulates the use of land, nor, except as provided by subparagraph (J), shall either one be subject to any state approval. A sustainable communities strategy does not supersede the exercise of the land use authority of cities and counties within the region. This section does not limit the State Air Resources Board’s authority under any other law. This section does not authorize the abrogation of any vested right whether created by statute or by common law. This section does not require a city’s or county’s land use policies and regulations, including its general plan, to be consistent with the regional transportation plan or an alternative planning strategy. This section does not require a metropolitan planning organization to approve a sustainable communities strategy that would be inconsistent with Part 450 of Title 23 of, or Part 93 of Title 40 of, the Code of Federal Regulations and any administrative guidance under those regulations. This section does not relieve a public or private entity or any person from compliance with any other local, state, or federal law.(L) This section does not require projects programmed for funding on or before December 31, 2011, to be subject to this paragraph if they (i) are contained in the 2007 or 2009 Federal Statewide Transportation Improvement Program, (ii) are funded pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2), or (iii) were specifically listed in a ballot measure before December 31, 2008, approving a sales tax increase for transportation projects. This section does not require a transportation sales tax authority to change the funding allocations approved by the voters for categories of transportation projects in a sales tax measure adopted before December 31, 2010. For purposes of this subparagraph, a transportation sales tax authority is a district, as defined in Section 7252 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, that is authorized to impose a sales tax for transportation purposes.(M) A metropolitan planning organization, or a regional transportation planning agency not within a metropolitan planning organization, that is required to adopt a regional transportation plan not less than every five years may elect to adopt the plan not less than every four years. This election shall be made by the board of directors of the metropolitan planning organization or regional transportation planning agency no later than June 1, 2009, or thereafter 54 months before the statutory deadline for the adoption of housing elements for the local jurisdictions within the region, after a public hearing at which comments are accepted from members of the public and representatives of cities and counties within the region covered by the metropolitan planning organization or regional transportation planning agency. Notice of the public hearing shall be given to the general public and by mail to cities and counties within the region no later than 30 days before the date of the public hearing. Notice of election shall be promptly given to the Department of Housing and Community Development. The metropolitan planning organization or the regional transportation planning agency shall complete its next regional transportation plan within three years of the notice of election.(N) Two or more of the metropolitan planning organizations for Fresno County, Kern County, Kings County, Madera County, Merced County, San Joaquin County, Stanislaus County, and Tulare County may work together to develop and adopt multiregional goals and policies that may address interregional land use, transportation, economic, air quality, and climate relationships. The participating metropolitan planning organizations may also develop a multiregional sustainable communities strategy, to the extent consistent with federal law, or an alternative planning strategy for adoption by the metropolitan planning organizations. Each participating metropolitan planning organization shall consider any adopted multiregional goals and policies in the development of a sustainable communities strategy and, if applicable, an alternative planning strategy for its region.(3) An action element that describes the programs and actions necessary to implement the plan and assigns implementation responsibilities. The action element may describe all transportation projects proposed for development during the 20-year or greater life of the plan. The action element shall consider congestion management programming activities carried out within the region.(4) (A) A financial element that summarizes the cost of plan implementation constrained by a realistic projection of available revenues. The financial element shall also contain recommendations for allocation of funds. A county transportation commission created pursuant to the County Transportation Commissions Act (Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000) of the Public Utilities Code) shall be responsible for recommending projects to be funded with regional improvement funds, if the project is consistent with the regional transportation plan. The first five years of the financial element shall be based on the five-year estimate of funds developed pursuant to Section 14524. The financial element may recommend the development of specified new sources of revenue, consistent with the policy element and action element.(B) The financial element of transportation planning agencies with populations that exceed 200,000 persons may include a project cost breakdown for all projects proposed for development during the 20-year life of the plan that includes total expenditures and related percentages of total expenditures for all of the following:(i) State highway expansion.(ii) State highway rehabilitation, maintenance, and operations.(iii) Local road and street expansion.(iv) Local road and street rehabilitation, maintenance, and operation.(v) Mass transit, commuter rail, and intercity rail expansion.(vi) Mass transit, commuter rail, and intercity rail rehabilitation, maintenance, and operations.(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle facilities.(viii) Environmental enhancements and mitigation.(ix) Research and planning.(x) Other categories.(C) The metropolitan planning organization or county transportation agency, whichever entity is appropriate, shall consider financial incentives for cities and counties that have resource areas or farmland, as defined in Section 65080.01, for the purposes of, for example, transportation investments for the preservation and safety of the city street or county road system and farm-to-market and interconnectivity transportation needs. The metropolitan planning organization or county transportation agency, whichever entity is appropriate, shall also consider financial assistance for counties to address countywide service responsibilities in counties that contribute toward the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets by implementing policies for growth to occur within their cities.(c) Each transportation planning agency may also include other factors of local significance as an element of the regional transportation plan, including, but not limited to, issues of mobility for specific sectors of the community, including, but not limited to, senior citizens.(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, each transportation planning agency shall adopt and submit, every four years, an updated regional transportation plan to the California Transportation Commission and the Department of Transportation. A transportation planning agency located in a federally designated air quality attainment area or that does not contain an urbanized area may at its option adopt and submit a regional transportation plan every five years. When applicable, the plan shall be consistent with federal planning and programming requirements and shall conform to the regional transportation plan guidelines adopted by the California Transportation Commission. Before adoption of the regional transportation plan, a public hearing shall be held after the giving of notice of the hearing by publication in the affected county or counties pursuant to Section 6061.(2) (A) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), and paragraph (1), the regional transportation plan, sustainable communities strategy, and environmental impact report adopted by the San Diego Association of Governments on October 9, 2015, shall remain in effect for all purposes, including for purposes of consistency determinations and funding eligibility for the San Diego Association of Governments and all other agencies relying on those documents, until the San Diego Association of Governments adopts its next update to its regional transportation plan.(B) The San Diego Association of Governments shall adopt and submit its update to the 2015 regional transportation plan on or before December 31, 2021.(C) After the update described in subparagraph (B), the time period for San Diego Association of Governments’ updates to its regional transportation plan shall be reset and shall be adopted and submitted every four years.(D) Notwithstanding clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the State Air Resources Board shall not update the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets for the region within the jurisdiction of the San Diego Association of Governments before the adoption of the update to the regional transportation plan pursuant to subparagraph (B).(E) The update to the regional transportation plan adopted by the San Diego Association of Governments on October 9, 2015, which will be prepared and submitted to federal agencies for purposes of compliance with federal laws applicable to regional transportation plans and air quality conformity and which is due in October 2019, shall not be considered a regional transportation plan pursuant to this section and shall not constitute a project for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).(F) In addition to meeting the other requirements to nominate a project for funding through the Solutions for Congested Corridors Program (Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 2390) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code), the San Diego Association of Governments, until December 31, 2021, shall only nominate projects for funding through the Solutions for Congested Corridors Program that are consistent with the eligibility requirements for projects under any of the following programs:(i) The Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program (Part 2 (commencing with Section 75220) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code).(ii) The Low Carbon Transit Operations Program (Part 3 (commencing with Section 75230) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code).(iii) The Active Transportation Program (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2380) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code).(G) Commencing January 1, 2020, and every two years thereafter, the San Diego Association of Governments shall begin developing an implementation report that tracks the implementation of its most recently adopted sustainable communities strategy. The report shall discuss the status of the implementation of the strategy at the regional and local levels, and any successes and barriers that have occurred since the last report. The San Diego Association of Governments shall submit the implementation report to the State Air Resources Board by including it in its sustainable communities strategy implementation review pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(3) (A) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), and paragraph (1), the regional transportation plan, sustainable communities strategy, and environmental impact report adopted by the Sacramento Area Council of Governments on November 18, 2019, shall remain in effect for all purposes, including for purposes of consistency determinations and funding eligibility for the Sacramento Area Council of Governments and all other agencies relying on those documents, until the Sacramento Area Council of Governments adopts its next update to its regional transportation plan.(B) The Sacramento Area Council of Governments shall adopt and submit its update to the 2020 regional transportation plan adopted on November 18, 2019, to the California Transportation Commission and the Department of Transportation on or before December 31, 2025. After adoption, the Sacramento Area Council of Governments shall submit the sustainable communities strategy to the State Air Resources Board in accordance with clause (ii) of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(C) The update described in subparagraph (B) shall include all of the following:(i) Development and pilot implementation of an equity-centered, community cocreated infrastructure project development and funding prioritization process in disadvantaged communities, as identified through the Sacramento Area Council of Governments’ implementation of a grant awarded through the federal Rebuilding American Infrastructure with Sustainability and Equity Discretionary Grant program.(ii) A description of how the update furthers equity and inclusion through engagement efforts.(iii) Data and analysis of the update’s performance outcomes in disadvantaged communities.(D) (i) Until December 31, 2025, in addition to the other requirements to nominate a project for funding through the Solutions for Congested Corridors Program established in Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 2390) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code, a project located in the region within the jurisdiction of the Sacramento Area Council of Governments may be nominated for funding through the Solutions for Congested Corridors Program only if the project would also satisfy the eligibility requirements of one or more of the following programs:(I) The Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program established in Part 2 (commencing with Section 75220) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code.(II) The Low Carbon Transit Operations Program established in Part 3 (commencing with Section 75230) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code.(III) The Active Transportation Program established in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2380) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code.(ii) This subparagraph does not apply to a project for which federal discretionary funding has been committed.(E) After the update described in subparagraph (B), the Sacramento Area Council of Governments shall adopt and submit its next update to its regional transportation plan within two years, on or before November 15, 2027, and adopt and submit subsequent updates to its regional transportation plan every four years.(F) Notwithstanding clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the State Air Resources Board shall not apply any update to the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets for the region within the jurisdiction of the Sacramento Area Council of Governments before the adoption of the update to the regional transportation plan pursuant to subparagraph (B).(G) The update to the Sacramento Area Council of Governments’ regional transportation plan that will be prepared and submitted to federal agencies for purposes of compliance with federal laws applicable to regional transportation plans and air quality conformity and that is due in November 2023 shall not be considered a regional transportation plan pursuant to this section.(H) (i) On or before July 1, 2026, and biennially thereafter, the Sacramento Area Council of Governments shall report, in a publicly available format on its internet website, on the regional implementation of its most recently adopted sustainable communities strategy using indicators developed and vetted with stakeholders.(ii) The information reported on its internet website pursuant to clause (i) shall include all of the following:(I) A comparison between the land use and housing development assumptions included in the most recently adopted sustainable communities strategy and housing production activity in the region as measured by the issuance of building permits by local agencies.(II) A discussion of the comparison’s results, including identification of the principal factors that determine the extent to which the land use and housing development assumptions included in the most recently adopted sustainable communities strategy have or have not been realized and whether those assumptions reflect the requirement to use the most recent planning assumptions considering local general plans and other factors, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), including by integrating feedback from housing developers, local governments, and other stakeholders.(III) The status of approvals for, funding for, construction of, and projected dates of operation for transportation projects in the region in comparison to the investments and timing included in the most recently adopted sustainable communities strategy.(iii) This subparagraph is not intended, and shall not be construed, to affect the land use authority of local governments, as described in subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). This subparagraph does not modify the authority of the metropolitan planning organization with respect to the adoption of a sustainable communities strategy pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) or implementation of the regional housing needs allocation in local housing elements.SEC. 3. Section 65584.01 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 9 of Chapter 22 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:65584.01. For the fourth and subsequent revision of the housing element pursuant to Section 65588, the department, in consultation with each council of governments, where applicable, shall determine the existing and projected need for housing for each region in the following manner:(a) The department’s determination shall be based upon population projections produced by the Department of Finance and regional population forecasts used in preparing regional transportation plans, in consultation with each council of governments. If the total regional population forecast for the projection year, developed by the council of governments and used for the preparation of the regional transportation plan, is within a range of 1.5 percent of the total regional population forecast for the projection year by the Department of Finance, then the population forecast developed by the council of governments shall be the basis from which the department determines the existing and projected need for housing in the region. If the difference between the total population projected by the council of governments and the total population projected for the region by the Department of Finance is greater than 1.5 percent, then the department and the council of governments shall meet to discuss variances in methodology used for population projections and seek agreement on a population projection for the region to be used as a basis for determining the existing and projected housing need for the region. If agreement is not reached, then the population projection for the region shall be the population projection for the region prepared by the Department of Finance as may be modified by the department as a result of discussions with the council of governments.(b) (1) At least 26 months prior to the scheduled revision pursuant to Section 65588 and prior to developing the existing and projected housing need for a region, the department shall meet and consult with the council of governments regarding the assumptions and methodology to be used by the department to determine the region’s housing needs. The council of governments shall provide data assumptions from the council’s projections, including, if available, the following data for the region:(A) (i) Anticipated household growth associated with projected population increases.(ii) The Department of Finance shall consider changes in enrollment levels at campuses of the University of California or the California State University in the region, as forecasted by the University of California and the California State University pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (e) of Section 65584.04, when preparing the anticipated household growth associated with projected population increases.(B) Household size data and trends in household size.(C) The percentage of households that are overcrowded within the region and the percentage of households that are overcrowded throughout the nation. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term “overcrowded” means more than one resident per room in each room in a dwelling.(D) The rate of household formation, or headship rates, based on age, gender, ethnicity, or other established demographic measures.(E) The vacancy rates in existing housing stock, and the vacancy rates for healthy housing market functioning and regional mobility, as well as housing replacement needs. For purposes of this subparagraph, the vacancy rate for a healthy rental housing market shall be considered no less than 5 percent.(F) Other characteristics of the composition of the projected population.(G) The relationship between jobs and housing, including any imbalance between jobs and housing.(H) The percentage of households that are cost burdened within the region and the percentage of households that are cost burdened throughout the nation. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the term “cost burdened” means the share of very low, low-, moderate-, and above moderate-income households that are paying more than 30 percent of household income on housing costs.(I) The loss of units during a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2), during the planning period immediately preceding the relevant revision pursuant to Section 65588 that have yet to be rebuilt or replaced at the time of the data request.(J) The housing needs of individuals and families experiencing homelessness.(i) The data utilized by the council of governments shall align with homelessness data best practices as determined by the department.(ii) Sources of homelessness data may include the Homeless Data Integration System administered by the Interagency Council on Homelessness, the homeless point-in-time count, or other sources deemed appropriate by the department.(2) The department may accept or reject the information provided by the council of governments or modify its own assumptions or methodology based on this information. After consultation with the council of governments, the department shall make determinations in writing on the assumptions for each of the factors listed in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, of paragraph (1) and the methodology it shall use and shall provide these determinations to the council of governments. The methodology submitted by the department may make adjustments based on the region’s total projected households, which includes existing households as well as projected households.(c) (1) After consultation with the council of governments, the department shall make a determination of the region’s existing and projected housing need based upon the assumptions and methodology determined pursuant to subdivision (b). The region’s existing and projected housing need shall reflect the achievement of a feasible balance between jobs and housing within the region using the regional employment projections in the applicable regional transportation plan. Within 30 days following notice of the determination from the department, the council of governments may file an objection to the department’s determination of the region’s existing and projected housing need with the department.(2) The objection shall be based on and substantiate either of the following:(A) The department failed to base its determination on the population projection for the region established pursuant to subdivision (a), and shall identify the population projection which the council of governments believes should instead be used for the determination and explain the basis for its rationale.(B) The regional housing need determined by the department is not a reasonable application of the methodology and assumptions determined pursuant to subdivision (b). The objection shall include a proposed alternative determination of its regional housing need based upon the determinations made in subdivision (b), including analysis of why the proposed alternative would be a more reasonable application of the methodology and assumptions determined pursuant to subdivision (b).(3) If a council of governments files an objection pursuant to this subdivision and includes with the objection a proposed alternative determination of its regional housing need, it shall also include documentation of its basis for the alternative determination. Within 45 days of receiving an objection filed pursuant to this section, the department shall consider the objection and make a final written determination of the region’s existing and projected housing need that includes an explanation of the information upon which the determination was made.(4) In regions in which the department is required to distribute the regional housing need pursuant to Section 65584.06, no city or county may file an objection to the regional housing need determination.(d) Statutory changes enacted after the date the department issued a final determination pursuant to this section shall not be a basis for a revision of the final determination.SEC. 3.5. Section 65584.01 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 9 of Chapter 22 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:65584.01. For the fourth and subsequent revision of the housing element pursuant to Section 65588, the department, in consultation with each council of governments, where applicable, shall determine the existing and projected need for housing for each region in the following manner:(a) The department’s determination shall be based upon population projections produced by the Department of Finance and regional population forecasts used in preparing regional transportation plans, in consultation with each council of governments. If the total regional population forecast for the projection year, developed by the council of governments and used for the preparation of the regional transportation plan, is within a range of 1.5 percent of the total regional population forecast for the projection year by the Department of Finance, then the population forecast developed by the council of governments shall be the basis from which the department determines the existing and projected need for housing in the region. If the difference between the total population projected by the council of governments and the total population projected for the region by the Department of Finance is greater than 1.5 percent, then the department and the council of governments shall meet to discuss variances in methodology used for population projections and seek agreement on a population projection for the region to be used as a basis for determining the existing and projected housing need for the region. If agreement is not reached, then the population projection for the region shall be the population projection for the region prepared by the Department of Finance as may be modified by the department as a result of discussions with the council of governments.(b) (1) Subject to the applicable deadline specified in paragraph (2), and prior to developing the existing and projected housing need for a region, the department shall meet and consult with the council of governments regarding the assumptions and methodology to be used by the department to determine the region’s housing needs. The council of governments shall provide data assumptions from the council’s projections, including, if available, the following data for the region:(A) (i) Anticipated household growth associated with projected population increases.(ii) The Department of Finance shall consider changes in enrollment levels at campuses of the University of California or the California State University in the region, as forecasted by the University of California and the California State University pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (e) of Section 65584.04, when preparing the anticipated household growth associated with projected population increases.(B) Household size data and trends in household size.(C) The percentage of households that are overcrowded within the region and the percentage of households that are overcrowded throughout the nation. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term “overcrowded” means more than one resident per room in each room in a dwelling.(D) The rate of household formation, or headship rates, based on age, gender, ethnicity, or other established demographic measures.(E) The vacancy rates in existing housing stock, and the vacancy rates for healthy housing market functioning and regional mobility, as well as housing replacement needs. For purposes of this subparagraph, the vacancy rate for a healthy rental housing market shall be considered no less than 5 percent.(F) Other characteristics of the composition of the projected population.(G) The relationship between jobs and housing, including any imbalance between jobs and housing.(H) The percentage of households that are cost burdened within the region and the percentage of households that are cost burdened throughout the nation. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the term “cost burdened” means the share of very low, low-, moderate-, and above moderate-income households that are paying more than 30 percent of household income on housing costs.(I) The loss of units during a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2), during the planning period immediately preceding the relevant revision pursuant to Section 65588 that have yet to be rebuilt or replaced at the time of the data request.(J) The housing needs of individuals and families experiencing homelessness.(i) The data utilized by the council of governments shall align with homelessness data best practices as determined by the department.(ii) Sources of homelessness data may include the Homeless Data Integration System administered by the Interagency Council on Homelessness, the homeless point-in-time count, or other sources deemed appropriate by the department.(2) The deadline for the department to meet and consult with each council of governments pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be as follows:(A) For the fourth, fifth, and sixth revisions of the housing element, at least 26 months prior to the scheduled revision pursuant to Section 65588.(B) For the seventh revision of the housing element, the applicable of the following:(i) With respect to the following councils of governments, at least 26 months prior to the scheduled revision pursuant to Section 65588:(I) The Humboldt County Association of Governments.(II) The Lake Area Planning Council.(III) The Mendocino Council of Governments.(IV) The County of Nevada.(ii) With respect to the following councils of governments, at least 34 months prior to the scheduled revision pursuant to Section 65588:(I) The San Luis Obispo Council of Governments.(II) The Sacramento Area Council of Governments.(iii) With respect to all councils of governments other than those specified in clauses (i) and (ii), at least 38 months prior to the scheduled revision pursuant to Section 65588.(C) For the eighth and subsequent revisions of the housing element, at least 38 months prior to the scheduled revision pursuant to Section 65588.(3) The department may accept or reject the information provided by the council of governments or modify its own assumptions or methodology based on this information. After consultation with the council of governments, the department shall make determinations in writing on the assumptions for each of the factors listed in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, of paragraph (1) and the methodology it shall use and shall provide these determinations to the council of governments. The methodology submitted by the department may make adjustments based on the region’s total projected households, which includes existing households as well as projected households.(c) (1) After consultation with the council of governments, the department shall make a determination of the region’s existing and projected housing need based upon the assumptions and methodology determined pursuant to subdivision (b). The region’s existing and projected housing need shall reflect the achievement of a feasible balance between jobs and housing within the region using the regional employment projections in the applicable regional transportation plan. Within 30 days following notice of the determination from the department, the council of governments may file an objection to the department’s determination of the region’s existing and projected housing need with the department.(2) The objection shall be based on and substantiate either of the following:(A) The department failed to base its determination on the population projection for the region established pursuant to subdivision (a), and shall identify the population projection which the council of governments believes should instead be used for the determination and explain the basis for its rationale.(B) The regional housing need determined by the department is not a reasonable application of the methodology and assumptions determined pursuant to subdivision (b). The objection shall include a proposed alternative determination of its regional housing need based upon the determinations made in subdivision (b), including analysis of why the proposed alternative would be a more reasonable application of the methodology and assumptions determined pursuant to subdivision (b).(3) If a council of governments files an objection pursuant to this subdivision and includes with the objection a proposed alternative determination of its regional housing need, it shall also include documentation of its basis for the alternative determination. Within 45 days of receiving an objection filed pursuant to this section, the department shall consider the objection and make a final written determination of the region’s existing and projected housing need that includes an explanation of the information upon which the determination was made.(4) In regions in which the department is required to distribute the regional housing need pursuant to Section 65584.06, no city or county may file an objection to the regional housing need determination.(d) Statutory changes enacted after the date the department issued a final determination pursuant to this section shall not be a basis for a revision of the final determination.SEC. 4. Section 65584.04 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 10 of Chapter 22 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:65584.04. (a) At least two years before a scheduled revision required by Section 65588, each council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, shall develop, in consultation with the department, a proposed methodology for distributing the existing and projected regional housing need to cities, counties, and cities and counties within the region or within the subregion, where applicable pursuant to this section. The methodology shall further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(b) (1) No more than six months before the development of a proposed methodology for distributing the existing and projected housing need, each council of governments shall survey each of its member jurisdictions to request, at a minimum, information regarding the factors listed in subdivision (e) that will allow the development of a methodology based upon the factors established in subdivision (e).(2) With respect to the objective in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 65584, the survey shall review and compile information that will allow the development of a methodology based upon the issues, strategies, and actions that are included, as available, in an Analysis of Impediments to Fair Housing Choice or an Assessment of Fair Housing completed by any city or county or the department that covers communities within the area served by the council of governments, and in housing elements adopted pursuant to this article by cities and counties within the area served by the council of governments.(3) The council of governments shall seek to obtain the information in a manner and format that is comparable throughout the region and use readily available data to the extent possible.(4) The information provided by a local government pursuant to this section shall be used, to the extent possible, by the council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, as source information for the methodology developed pursuant to this section. The survey shall state that none of the information received may be used as a basis for reducing the total housing need established for the region pursuant to Section 65584.01.(5) If the council of governments fails to conduct a survey pursuant to this subdivision, a city, county, or city and county may submit information related to the items listed in subdivision (e) before the public comment period provided for in subdivision (d).(c) The council of governments shall electronically report the results of the survey of fair housing issues, strategies, and actions compiled pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The report shall describe common themes and effective strategies employed by cities and counties within the area served by the council of governments, including common themes and effective strategies around avoiding the displacement of lower income households. The council of governments shall also identify significant barriers to affirmatively furthering fair housing at the regional level and may recommend strategies or actions to overcome those barriers. A council of governments or metropolitan planning organization, as appropriate, may use this information for any other purpose, including publication within a regional transportation plan adopted pursuant to Section 65080 or to inform the land use assumptions that are applied in the development of a regional transportation plan.(d) Public participation and access shall be required in the development of the methodology and in the process of drafting and adoption of the allocation of the regional housing needs. Participation by organizations other than local jurisdictions and councils of governments shall be solicited in a diligent effort to achieve public participation of all economic segments of the community as well as members of protected classes under Section 12955 and households with special housing needs under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583. The proposed methodology, along with any relevant underlying data and assumptions, an explanation of how information about local government conditions gathered pursuant to subdivision (b) has been used to develop the proposed methodology, how each of the factors listed in subdivision (e) is incorporated into the methodology, and how the proposed methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584, shall be distributed to all cities, counties, any subregions, and members of the public who have made a written or electronic request for the proposed methodology and published on the council of governments’, or delegate subregion’s, internet website. The council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall conduct at least one public hearing to receive oral and written comments on the proposed methodology.(e) To the extent that sufficient data is available from local governments pursuant to subdivision (b) or other sources, each council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, shall consider including the following factors in developing the methodology that allocates regional housing needs:(1) Each member jurisdiction’s existing and projected jobs and housing relationship. This shall include an estimate based on readily available data on the number of low-wage jobs within the jurisdiction and how many housing units within the jurisdiction are affordable to low-wage workers as well as an estimate based on readily available data, of projected job growth and projected household growth by income level within each member jurisdiction during the planning period.(2) The opportunities and constraints to development of additional housing in each member jurisdiction, including all of the following:(A) Lack of capacity for sewer or water service due to federal or state laws, regulations or regulatory actions, or supply and distribution decisions made by a sewer or water service provider other than the local jurisdiction that preclude the jurisdiction from providing necessary infrastructure for additional development during the planning period.(B) The availability of land suitable for urban development or for conversion to residential use, the availability of underutilized land, and opportunities for infill development and increased residential densities. The council of governments may not limit its consideration of suitable housing sites or land suitable for urban development to existing zoning ordinances and land use restrictions of a locality, but shall consider the potential for increased residential development under alternative zoning ordinances and land use restrictions. The determination of available land suitable for urban development may exclude lands where the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) or the Department of Water Resources has determined that the flood management infrastructure designed to protect that land is not adequate to avoid the risk of flooding.(C) Lands preserved or protected from urban development under existing federal or state programs, or both, designed to protect open space, farmland, environmental habitats, and natural resources on a long-term basis, including land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts conversion to nonagricultural uses.(D) County policies to preserve prime agricultural land, as defined pursuant to Section 56064, within an unincorporated area and land within an unincorporated area zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts its conversion to nonagricultural uses.(E) Emergency evacuation route capacity, wildfire risk, sea level rise, and other impacts caused by climate change.(3) The distribution of household growth assumed for purposes of a comparable period of regional transportation plans and opportunities to maximize the use of public transportation and existing transportation infrastructure.(4) Agreements between a county and cities in a county to direct growth toward incorporated areas of the county and land within an unincorporated area zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of the jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts conversion to nonagricultural uses.(5) The loss of units contained in assisted housing developments, as defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583, that changed to non-low-income use through mortgage prepayment, subsidy contract expirations, or termination of use restrictions.(6) The percentage of existing households at each of the income levels listed in subdivision (f) of Section 65584 that are paying more than 30 percent and more than 50 percent of their income in rent.(7) The rate of overcrowding.(8) The housing needs of farmworkers.(9) (A) The housing needs generated by the presence of a private university or a campus of the California State University or the University of California within any member jurisdiction, the distribution of those students among jurisdictions within the region, and for a campus of the California State University or the University of California, the optimization of transit, pedestrian, and other nonvehicle trip efficiency by students to the campus, including off-campus facilities.(B) (i) No more than six months before the development of the methodology, the Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide to each council of governments a forecast of changes in enrollment levels at its campuses, including off-campus facilities, within the region, based on factors including, but not limited to, (I) cohort progression projections, (II) improvements in the percentage of California residents meeting university admission and transfer standards, and (III) improvements in degree completion by noncohort students. The forecast shall not be limited to students who will be recent high school graduates. The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide copies of the forecast to the Director of Finance, the Director of Housing and Community Development, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.(ii) Clause (i) shall apply to the seventh and each subsequent housing element cycle, except as specified in clause (iii).(iii) With respect to all of the following councils of governments, clause (i) shall apply to the eighth and each subsequent housing element cycles:(I) The Humboldt County Association of Governments.(II) The Lake Area Planning Council.(III) The Mendocino Council of Governments.(C) The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide trip and travel data to the council of governments upon request.(10) The housing needs of individuals and families experiencing homelessness. If a council of governments has surveyed each of its member jurisdictions pursuant to subdivision (b) on or before January 1, 2020, this paragraph shall apply only to the development of methodologies for the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element.(11) The loss of units during a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2), during the planning period immediately preceding the relevant revision pursuant to Section 65588 that have yet to be rebuilt or replaced at the time of the analysis.(12) The region’s greenhouse gas emissions targets provided by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 65080.(13) Any other factors adopted by the council of governments, that further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584, provided that the council of governments specifies which of the objectives each additional factor is necessary to further. The council of governments may include additional factors unrelated to furthering the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 so long as the additional factors do not undermine the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 and are applied equally across all household income levels as described in subdivision (f) of Section 65584 and the council of governments makes a finding that the factor is necessary to address significant health and safety conditions.(f) The council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall explain in writing how each of the factors described in subdivision (e) was incorporated into the methodology and how the methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. The methodology may include numerical weighting. This information, and any other supporting materials used in determining the methodology, shall be posted on the council of governments’, or delegate subregion’s, internet website.(g) The following criteria shall not be a justification for a determination or a reduction in a jurisdiction’s share of the regional housing need:(1) Any ordinance, policy, voter-approved measure, or standard of a city or county that directly or indirectly limits the number of residential building permits issued by a city or county.(2) Prior underproduction of housing in a city or county from the previous regional housing need allocation, as determined by each jurisdiction’s annual production report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400.(3) Stable population numbers in a city or county from the previous regional housing needs cycle.(h) Following the conclusion of the public comment period described in subdivision (d) on the proposed allocation methodology, and after making any revisions deemed appropriate by the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, as a result of comments received during the public comment period, and as a result of consultation with the department, each council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall publish a draft allocation methodology on its internet website and submit the draft allocation methodology, along with the information required pursuant to subdivision (e), to the department.(i) Within 60 days, the department shall review the draft allocation methodology and report its written findings to the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable. In its written findings the department shall determine whether the methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. If the department determines that the methodology is not consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 65584, the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall take both of the following actions:(1) Revise the methodology, in consultation with the department, to further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 within 45 days.(2) Receive department acceptance that the revised methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 and adopt a final regional, or subregional, housing need allocation methodology.(j) If the department’s findings are not available within the time limits set by subdivision (i), the council of governments, or delegate subregion, may act without them.(k) After taking action pursuant to subdivision (i), the council of governments, or delegate subregion, shall provide notice of the adoption of the methodology to the jurisdictions within the region, or delegate subregion, as applicable, and to the department, and shall publish the adopted allocation methodology, along with its resolution and any adopted written findings, on its internet website.(l) The department may, within 45 days, review the adopted methodology and report its findings to the council of governments, or delegate subregion.(m) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that housing planning be coordinated and integrated with the regional transportation plan. To achieve this goal, the allocation plan shall allocate housing units within the region consistent with the development pattern included in the sustainable communities strategy.(2) (A) The final allocation plan shall ensure that the total regional housing need, by income category, as determined under Section 65584, is maintained, and that each jurisdiction in the region receive an allocation of units for low- and very low income households.(B) For the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element, the allocation to each region required under subparagraph (A) shall also include an allocation of units for acutely low and extremely low income households.(3) The resolution approving the final housing need allocation plan shall demonstrate that the plan is consistent with the sustainable communities strategy in the regional transportation plan and furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.SEC. 4.1. Section 65584.04 of the Government Code is amended to read:65584.04. (a) At least two and one-half years before a scheduled revision required by Section 65588, each council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, shall develop, in consultation with the department, a proposed methodology for distributing the existing and projected regional housing need to cities, counties, and cities and counties within the region or within the subregion, where applicable pursuant to this section. The methodology shall further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(b) (1) No more than six months before the development of a proposed methodology for distributing the existing and projected housing need, each council of governments shall survey each of its member jurisdictions to request, at a minimum, information regarding the factors listed in subdivision (e) that will allow the development of a methodology based upon the factors established in subdivision (e).(2) With respect to the objective in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 65584, the survey shall review and compile information that will allow the development of a methodology based upon the issues, strategies, and actions that are included, as available, in an Analysis of Impediments to Fair Housing Choice or an Assessment of Fair Housing completed by any city or county or the department that covers communities within the area served by the council of governments, and in housing elements adopted pursuant to this article by cities and counties within the area served by the council of governments.(3) The council of governments shall seek to obtain the information in a manner and format that is comparable throughout the region and use readily available data to the extent possible.(4) The information provided by a local government pursuant to this section shall be used, to the extent possible, by the council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, as source information for the methodology developed pursuant to this section. The survey shall state that none of the information received may be used as a basis for reducing the total housing need established for the region pursuant to Section 65584.01.(5) If the council of governments fails to conduct a survey pursuant to this subdivision, a city, county, or city and county may submit information related to the items listed in subdivision (e) before the public comment period provided for in subdivision (d).(c) The council of governments shall electronically report the results of the survey of fair housing issues, strategies, and actions compiled pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The report shall describe common themes and effective strategies employed by cities and counties within the area served by the council of governments, including common themes and effective strategies around avoiding the displacement of lower income households. The council of governments shall also identify significant barriers to affirmatively furthering fair housing at the regional level and may recommend strategies or actions to overcome those barriers. A council of governments or metropolitan planning organization, as appropriate, may use this information for any other purpose, including publication within a regional transportation plan adopted pursuant to Section 65080 or to inform the land use assumptions that are applied in the development of a regional transportation plan.(d) Public participation and access shall be required in the development of the methodology and in the process of drafting and adoption of the allocation of the regional housing needs. Participation by organizations other than local jurisdictions and councils of governments shall be solicited in a diligent effort to achieve public participation of all economic segments of the community as well as members of protected classes under Section 12955 and households with special housing needs under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583. The proposed methodology, along with any relevant underlying data and assumptions, an explanation of how information about local government conditions gathered pursuant to subdivision (b) has been used to develop the proposed methodology, how each of the factors listed in subdivision (e) is incorporated into the methodology, and how the proposed methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584, shall be distributed to all cities, counties, any subregions, and members of the public who have made a written or electronic request for the proposed methodology and published on the council of governments’, or delegate subregion’s, internet website. The council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall conduct at least one public hearing to receive oral and written comments on the proposed methodology.(e) To the extent that sufficient data is available from local governments pursuant to subdivision (b) or other sources, each council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, shall consider including the following factors in developing the methodology that allocates regional housing needs:(1) Each member jurisdiction’s existing and projected jobs and housing relationship. This shall include an estimate based on readily available data on the number of low-wage jobs within the jurisdiction and how many housing units within the jurisdiction are affordable to low-wage workers as well as an estimate based on readily available data, of projected job growth and projected household growth by income level within each member jurisdiction during the planning period.(2) The opportunities and constraints to development of additional housing in each member jurisdiction, including all of the following:(A) Lack of capacity for sewer or water service due to federal or state laws, regulations or regulatory actions, or supply and distribution decisions made by a sewer or water service provider other than the local jurisdiction that preclude the jurisdiction from providing necessary infrastructure for additional development during the planning period.(B) The availability of land suitable for urban development or for conversion to residential use, the availability of underutilized land, and opportunities for infill development and increased residential densities. The council of governments may not limit its consideration of suitable housing sites or land suitable for urban development to existing zoning ordinances and land use restrictions of a locality, but shall consider the potential for increased residential development under alternative zoning ordinances and land use restrictions. The determination of available land suitable for urban development may exclude lands where the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) or the Department of Water Resources has determined that the flood management infrastructure designed to protect that land is not adequate to avoid the risk of flooding.(C) Lands preserved or protected from urban development under existing federal or state programs, or both, designed to protect open space, farmland, environmental habitats, and natural resources on a long-term basis, including land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts conversion to nonagricultural uses.(D) County policies to preserve prime agricultural land, as defined pursuant to Section 56064, within an unincorporated area and land within an unincorporated area zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts its conversion to nonagricultural uses.(E) Emergency evacuation route capacity, wildfire risk, sea level rise, and other impacts caused by climate change.(3) The distribution of household growth assumed for purposes of a comparable period of regional transportation plans and opportunities to maximize the use of public transportation and existing transportation infrastructure.(4) Agreements between a county and cities in a county to direct growth toward incorporated areas of the county and land within an unincorporated area zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of the jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts conversion to nonagricultural uses.(5) The loss of units contained in assisted housing developments, as defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583, that changed to non-low-income use through mortgage prepayment, subsidy contract expirations, or termination of use restrictions.(6) The percentage of existing households at each of the income levels listed in subdivision (f) of Section 65584 that are paying more than 30 percent and more than 50 percent of their income in rent.(7) The rate of overcrowding.(8) The housing needs of farmworkers.(9) (A) The housing needs generated by the presence of a private university or a campus of the California State University or the University of California within any member jurisdiction, the distribution of those students among jurisdictions within the region, and for a campus of the California State University or the University of California, the optimization of transit, pedestrian, and other nonvehicle trip efficiency by students to the campus, including off-campus facilities.(B) (i) No more than six months before the development of the methodology, the Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide to each council of governments a forecast of changes in enrollment levels at its campuses, including off-campus facilities, within the region, based on factors including, but not limited to, (I) cohort progression projections, (II) improvements in the percentage of California residents meeting university admission and transfer standards, and (III) improvements in degree completion by noncohort students. The forecast shall not be limited to students who will be recent high school graduates. The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide copies of the forecast to the Director of Finance, the Director of Housing and Community Development, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.(ii) Clause (i) shall apply to the seventh and each subsequent housing element cycle, except as specified in clause (iii).(iii) With respect to all of the following councils of governments, clause (i) shall apply to the eighth and each subsequent housing element cycles:(I) The Humboldt County Association of Governments.(II) The Lake Area Planning Council.(III) The Mendocino Council of Governments.(C) The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide trip and travel data to the council of governments upon request.(10) The housing needs of individuals and families experiencing homelessness. If a council of governments has surveyed each of its member jurisdictions pursuant to subdivision (b) on or before January 1, 2020, this paragraph shall apply only to the development of methodologies for the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element.(11) The loss of units during a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2), during the planning period immediately preceding the relevant revision pursuant to Section 65588 that have yet to be rebuilt or replaced at the time of the analysis.(12) The region’s greenhouse gas emissions targets provided by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 65080.(13) Any other factors adopted by the council of governments, that further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584, provided that the council of governments specifies which of the objectives each additional factor is necessary to further. The council of governments may include additional factors unrelated to furthering the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 so long as the additional factors do not undermine the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 and are applied equally across all household income levels as described in subdivision (f) of Section 65584 and the council of governments makes a finding that the factor is necessary to address significant health and safety conditions.(f) The council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall explain in writing how each of the factors described in subdivision (e) was incorporated into the methodology and how the methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. The methodology may include numerical weighting. This information, and any other supporting materials used in determining the methodology, shall be posted on the council of governments’, or delegate subregion’s, internet website.(g) The following criteria shall not be a justification for a determination or a reduction in a jurisdiction’s share of the regional housing need:(1) Any ordinance, policy, voter-approved measure, or standard of a city or county that directly or indirectly limits the number of residential building permits issued by a city or county.(2) Prior underproduction of housing in a city or county from the previous regional housing need allocation, as determined by each jurisdiction’s annual production report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400.(3) Stable population numbers in a city or county from the previous regional housing needs cycle.(h) Following the conclusion of the public comment period described in subdivision (d) on the proposed allocation methodology, and after making any revisions deemed appropriate by the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, as a result of comments received during the public comment period, and as a result of consultation with the department, each council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall publish a draft allocation methodology on its internet website and submit the draft allocation methodology, along with the information required pursuant to subdivision (e), to the department.(i) Within 60 days, the department shall review the draft allocation methodology and report its written findings to the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable. In its written findings the department shall determine whether the methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. If the department determines that the methodology is not consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 65584, the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall take both of the following actions:(1) Revise the methodology, in consultation with the department, to further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 within 45 days.(2) Receive department acceptance that the revised methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 and adopt a final regional, or subregional, housing need allocation methodology.(j) If the department’s findings are not available within the time limits set by subdivision (i), the council of governments, or delegate subregion, may act without them.(k) After taking action pursuant to subdivision (i), the council of governments, or delegate subregion, shall provide notice of the adoption of the methodology to the jurisdictions within the region, or delegate subregion, as applicable, and to the department, and shall publish the adopted allocation methodology, along with its resolution and any adopted written findings, on its internet website.(l) The department may, within 45 days, review the adopted methodology and report its findings to the council of governments, or delegate subregion.(m) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that housing planning be coordinated and integrated with the regional transportation plan. To achieve this goal, the allocation plan shall allocate housing units within the region consistent with the development pattern included in the sustainable communities strategy.(2) (A) The final allocation plan shall ensure that the total regional housing need, by income category, as determined under Section 65584, is maintained, and that each jurisdiction in the region receive an allocation of units for low- and very low income households.(B) For the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element, the allocation to each region required under subparagraph (A) shall also include an allocation of units for acutely low and extremely low income households.(3) The resolution approving the final housing need allocation plan shall demonstrate that the plan is consistent with the sustainable communities strategy in the regional transportation plan and furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.(o) For the seventh housing element cycle, the changes to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall not apply to councils of governments with a housing element revision due date during the 2027 calendar year.SEC. 4.2. Section 65584.04 of the Government Code is amended to read:65584.04. (a) At least two years before a scheduled revision required by Section 65588, each council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, shall develop, in consultation with the department, a proposed methodology for distributing the existing and projected regional housing need to cities, counties, and cities and counties within the region or within the subregion, where applicable pursuant to this section. The methodology shall further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(b) (1) No more than six months before the development of a proposed methodology for distributing the existing and projected housing need, each council of governments shall survey each of its member jurisdictions to request, at a minimum, information regarding the factors listed in subdivision (e) that will allow the development of a methodology based upon the factors established in subdivision (e).(2) With respect to the objective in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 65584, the survey shall review and compile information that will allow the development of a methodology based upon the issues, strategies, and actions that are included, as available, in an Analysis of Impediments to Fair Housing Choice or an Assessment of Fair Housing completed by any city or county or the department that covers communities within the area served by the council of governments, and in housing elements adopted pursuant to this article by cities and counties within the area served by the council of governments.(3) The council of governments shall seek to obtain the information in a manner and format that is comparable throughout the region and use readily available data to the extent possible.(4) The information provided by a local government pursuant to this section shall be used, to the extent possible, by the council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, as source information for the methodology developed pursuant to this section. The survey shall state that none of the information received may be used as a basis for reducing the total housing need established for the region pursuant to Section 65584.01.(5) If the council of governments fails to conduct a survey pursuant to this subdivision, a city, county, or city and county may submit information related to the items listed in subdivision (e) before the public comment period provided for in subdivision (d).(c) The council of governments shall electronically report the results of the survey of fair housing issues, strategies, and actions compiled pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The report shall describe common themes and effective strategies employed by cities and counties within the area served by the council of governments, including common themes and effective strategies around avoiding the displacement of lower income households. The council of governments shall also identify significant barriers to affirmatively furthering fair housing at the regional level and may recommend strategies or actions to overcome those barriers. A council of governments or metropolitan planning organization, as appropriate, may use this information for any other purpose, including publication within a regional transportation plan adopted pursuant to Section 65080 or to inform the land use assumptions that are applied in the development of a regional transportation plan.(d) Public participation and access shall be required in the development of the methodology and in the process of drafting and adoption of the allocation of the regional housing needs. Participation by organizations other than local jurisdictions and councils of governments shall be solicited in a diligent effort to achieve public participation of all economic segments of the community as well as members of protected classes under Section 12955 and households with special housing needs under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583. The proposed methodology, along with any relevant underlying data and assumptions, an explanation of how information about local government conditions gathered pursuant to subdivision (b) has been used to develop the proposed methodology, how each of the factors listed in subdivision (e) is incorporated into the methodology, and how the proposed methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584, shall be distributed to all cities, counties, any subregions, and members of the public who have made a written or electronic request for the proposed methodology and published on the council of governments’, or delegate subregion’s, internet website. The council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall conduct at least one public hearing to receive oral and written comments on the proposed methodology.(e) To the extent that sufficient data is available from local governments pursuant to subdivision (b) or other sources, each council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, shall consider including the following factors in developing the methodology that allocates regional housing needs:(1) Each member jurisdiction’s existing and projected jobs and housing relationship. This shall include an estimate based on readily available data on the number of low-wage jobs within the jurisdiction and how many housing units within the jurisdiction are affordable to low-wage workers as well as an estimate based on readily available data, of projected job growth and projected household growth by income level within each member jurisdiction during the planning period.(2) The opportunities and constraints to development of additional housing in each member jurisdiction, including all of the following:(A) Lack of capacity for sewer or water service due to federal or state laws, regulations or regulatory actions, or supply and distribution decisions made by a sewer or water service provider other than the local jurisdiction that preclude the jurisdiction from providing necessary infrastructure for additional development during the planning period.(B) The availability of land suitable for urban development or for conversion to residential use, the availability of underutilized land, and opportunities for infill development and increased residential densities. The council of governments may not limit its consideration of suitable housing sites or land suitable for urban development to existing zoning ordinances and land use restrictions of a locality, but shall consider the potential for increased residential development under alternative zoning ordinances and land use restrictions. The determination of available land suitable for urban development may exclude lands where the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) or the Department of Water Resources has determined that the flood management infrastructure designed to protect that land is not adequate to avoid the risk of flooding.(C) Lands preserved or protected from urban development under existing federal or state programs, or both, designed to protect open space, farmland, environmental habitats, and natural resources on a long-term basis, including land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts conversion to nonagricultural uses.(D) County policies to preserve prime agricultural land, as defined pursuant to Section 56064, within an unincorporated area and land within an unincorporated area zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts its conversion to nonagricultural uses.(E) Emergency evacuation route capacity, wildfire risk, sea level rise, and other impacts caused by climate change.(3) The distribution of household growth assumed for purposes of a comparable period of regional transportation plans and opportunities to maximize the use of public transportation and existing transportation infrastructure.(4) Agreements between a county and cities in a county to direct growth toward incorporated areas of the county and land within an unincorporated area zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of the jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts conversion to nonagricultural uses.(5) The loss of units contained in assisted housing developments, as defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583, that changed to non-low-income use through mortgage prepayment, subsidy contract expirations, or termination of use restrictions.(6) The percentage of existing households at each of the income levels listed in subdivision (f) of Section 65584 that are paying more than 30 percent and more than 50 percent of their income in rent.(7) The rate of overcrowding.(8) The housing needs of farmworkers.(9) (A) The housing needs generated by the presence of a private university or a campus of the California State University or the University of California within any member jurisdiction, the distribution of those students among jurisdictions within the region, and for a campus of the California State University or the University of California, the optimization of transit, pedestrian, and other nonvehicle trip efficiency by students to the campus, including off-campus facilities.(B) (i) No more than six months before the development of the methodology, the Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide to each council of governments a forecast of changes in enrollment levels at its campuses, including off-campus facilities, within the region, based on factors including, but not limited to, (I) cohort progression projections, (II) improvements in the percentage of California residents meeting university admission and transfer standards, and (III) improvements in degree completion by noncohort students. The forecast shall not be limited to students who will be recent high school graduates. The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide copies of the forecast to the Director of Finance, the Director of Housing and Community Development, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.(ii) Clause (i) shall apply to the seventh and each subsequent housing element cycle, except as specified in clause (iii).(iii) With respect to all of the following councils of governments, clause (i) shall apply to the eighth and each subsequent housing element cycles:(I) The Humboldt County Association of Governments.(II) The Lake Area Planning Council.(III) The Mendocino Council of Governments.(C) The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide trip and travel data to the council of governments upon request.(10) The housing needs of individuals and families experiencing homelessness. If a council of governments has surveyed each of its member jurisdictions pursuant to subdivision (b) on or before January 1, 2020, this paragraph shall apply only to the development of methodologies for the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element.(11) The loss of units during a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2), during the planning period immediately preceding the relevant revision pursuant to Section 65588 that have yet to be rebuilt or replaced at the time of the analysis.(12) The region’s greenhouse gas emissions targets provided by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 65080.(13) The development pattern set forth in the region’s sustainable communities strategy of its regional transportation plan.(14) Any other factors adopted by the council of governments, that further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584, provided that the council of governments specifies which of the objectives each additional factor is necessary to further. The council of governments may include additional factors unrelated to furthering the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 so long as the additional factors do not undermine the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 and are applied equally across all household income levels as described in subdivision (f) of Section 65584 and the council of governments makes a finding that the factor is necessary to address significant health and safety conditions.(f) The council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall explain in writing how each of the factors described in subdivision (e) was incorporated into the methodology and how the methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. The methodology may include numerical weighting. This information, and any other supporting materials used in determining the methodology, shall be posted on the council of governments’, or delegate subregion’s, internet website.(g) The following criteria shall not be a justification for a determination or a reduction in a jurisdiction’s share of the regional housing need:(1) Any ordinance, policy, voter-approved measure, or standard of a city or county that directly or indirectly limits the number of residential building permits issued by a city or county.(2) Prior underproduction of housing in a city or county from the previous regional housing need allocation, as determined by each jurisdiction’s annual production report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400.(3) Stable population numbers in a city or county from the previous regional housing needs cycle.(h) Following the conclusion of the public comment period described in subdivision (d) on the proposed allocation methodology, and after making any revisions deemed appropriate by the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, as a result of comments received during the public comment period, and as a result of consultation with the department, each council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall publish a draft allocation methodology on its internet website and submit the draft allocation methodology, along with the information required pursuant to subdivision (e), to the department.(i) Within 60 days, the department shall review the draft allocation methodology and report its written findings to the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable. In its written findings the department shall determine whether the methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. If the department determines that the methodology is not consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 65584, the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall take both of the following actions:(1) Revise the methodology, in consultation with the department, to further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 within 45 days.(2) Receive department acceptance that the revised methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 and adopt a final regional, or subregional, housing need allocation methodology.(j) If the department’s findings are not available within the time limits set by subdivision (i), the council of governments, or delegate subregion, may act without them.(k) After taking action pursuant to subdivision (i), the council of governments, or delegate subregion, shall provide notice of the adoption of the methodology to the jurisdictions within the region, or delegate subregion, as applicable, and to the department, and shall publish the adopted allocation methodology, along with its resolution and any adopted written findings, on its internet website.(l) The department may, within 45 days, review the adopted methodology and report its findings to the council of governments, or delegate subregion.(m) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that housing planning be coordinated and integrated with the regional transportation plan. To achieve this goal, the allocation plan shall be informed by the development pattern included in the sustainable communities strategy.(2) (A) The final allocation plan shall ensure that the total regional housing need, by income category, as determined under Section 65584, is maintained, and that each jurisdiction in the region receive an allocation of units for low- and very low income households.(B) For the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element, the allocation to each region required under subparagraph (A) shall also include an allocation of units for acutely low and extremely low income households.(3) The resolution approving the final housing need allocation plan shall demonstrate that the plan is informed by the sustainable communities strategy in the regional transportation plan and furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.SEC. 4.3. Section 65584.04 of the Government Code is amended to read:65584.04. (a) At least two and one-half years before a scheduled revision required by Section 65588, each council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, shall develop, in consultation with the department, a proposed methodology for distributing the existing and projected regional housing need to cities, counties, and cities and counties within the region or within the subregion, where applicable pursuant to this section. The methodology shall further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(b) (1) No more than six months before the development of a proposed methodology for distributing the existing and projected housing need, each council of governments shall survey each of its member jurisdictions to request, at a minimum, information regarding the factors listed in subdivision (e) that will allow the development of a methodology based upon the factors established in subdivision (e).(2) With respect to the objective in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 65584, the survey shall review and compile information that will allow the development of a methodology based upon the issues, strategies, and actions that are included, as available, in an Analysis of Impediments to Fair Housing Choice or an Assessment of Fair Housing completed by any city or county or the department that covers communities within the area served by the council of governments, and in housing elements adopted pursuant to this article by cities and counties within the area served by the council of governments.(3) The council of governments shall seek to obtain the information in a manner and format that is comparable throughout the region and use readily available data to the extent possible.(4) The information provided by a local government pursuant to this section shall be used, to the extent possible, by the council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, as source information for the methodology developed pursuant to this section. The survey shall state that none of the information received may be used as a basis for reducing the total housing need established for the region pursuant to Section 65584.01.(5) If the council of governments fails to conduct a survey pursuant to this subdivision, a city, county, or city and county may submit information related to the items listed in subdivision (e) before the public comment period provided for in subdivision (d).(c) The council of governments shall electronically report the results of the survey of fair housing issues, strategies, and actions compiled pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The report shall describe common themes and effective strategies employed by cities and counties within the area served by the council of governments, including common themes and effective strategies around avoiding the displacement of lower income households. The council of governments shall also identify significant barriers to affirmatively furthering fair housing at the regional level and may recommend strategies or actions to overcome those barriers. A council of governments or metropolitan planning organization, as appropriate, may use this information for any other purpose, including publication within a regional transportation plan adopted pursuant to Section 65080 or to inform the land use assumptions that are applied in the development of a regional transportation plan.(d) Public participation and access shall be required in the development of the methodology and in the process of drafting and adoption of the allocation of the regional housing needs. Participation by organizations other than local jurisdictions and councils of governments shall be solicited in a diligent effort to achieve public participation of all economic segments of the community as well as members of protected classes under Section 12955 and households with special housing needs under paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583. The proposed methodology, along with any relevant underlying data and assumptions, an explanation of how information about local government conditions gathered pursuant to subdivision (b) has been used to develop the proposed methodology, how each of the factors listed in subdivision (e) is incorporated into the methodology, and how the proposed methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584, shall be distributed to all cities, counties, any subregions, and members of the public who have made a written or electronic request for the proposed methodology and published on the council of governments’, or delegate subregion’s, internet website. The council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall conduct at least one public hearing to receive oral and written comments on the proposed methodology.(e) To the extent that sufficient data is available from local governments pursuant to subdivision (b) or other sources, each council of governments, or delegate subregion as applicable, shall consider including the following factors in developing the methodology that allocates regional housing needs:(1) Each member jurisdiction’s existing and projected jobs and housing relationship. This shall include an estimate based on readily available data on the number of low-wage jobs within the jurisdiction and how many housing units within the jurisdiction are affordable to low-wage workers as well as an estimate based on readily available data, of projected job growth and projected household growth by income level within each member jurisdiction during the planning period.(2) The opportunities and constraints to development of additional housing in each member jurisdiction, including all of the following:(A) Lack of capacity for sewer or water service due to federal or state laws, regulations or regulatory actions, or supply and distribution decisions made by a sewer or water service provider other than the local jurisdiction that preclude the jurisdiction from providing necessary infrastructure for additional development during the planning period.(B) The availability of land suitable for urban development or for conversion to residential use, the availability of underutilized land, and opportunities for infill development and increased residential densities. The council of governments may not limit its consideration of suitable housing sites or land suitable for urban development to existing zoning ordinances and land use restrictions of a locality, but shall consider the potential for increased residential development under alternative zoning ordinances and land use restrictions. The determination of available land suitable for urban development may exclude lands where the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) or the Department of Water Resources has determined that the flood management infrastructure designed to protect that land is not adequate to avoid the risk of flooding.(C) Lands preserved or protected from urban development under existing federal or state programs, or both, designed to protect open space, farmland, environmental habitats, and natural resources on a long-term basis, including land zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts conversion to nonagricultural uses.(D) County policies to preserve prime agricultural land, as defined pursuant to Section 56064, within an unincorporated area and land within an unincorporated area zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of that jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts its conversion to nonagricultural uses.(E) Emergency evacuation route capacity, wildfire risk, sea level rise, and other impacts caused by climate change.(3) The distribution of household growth assumed for purposes of a comparable period of regional transportation plans and opportunities to maximize the use of public transportation and existing transportation infrastructure.(4) Agreements between a county and cities in a county to direct growth toward incorporated areas of the county and land within an unincorporated area zoned or designated for agricultural protection or preservation that is subject to a local ballot measure that was approved by the voters of the jurisdiction that prohibits or restricts conversion to nonagricultural uses.(5) The loss of units contained in assisted housing developments, as defined in paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 65583, that changed to non-low-income use through mortgage prepayment, subsidy contract expirations, or termination of use restrictions.(6) The percentage of existing households at each of the income levels listed in subdivision (f) of Section 65584 that are paying more than 30 percent and more than 50 percent of their income in rent.(7) The rate of overcrowding.(8) The housing needs of farmworkers.(9) (A) The housing needs generated by the presence of a private university or a campus of the California State University or the University of California within any member jurisdiction, the distribution of those students among jurisdictions within the region, and for a campus of the California State University or the University of California, the optimization of transit, pedestrian, and other nonvehicle trip efficiency by students to the campus, including off-campus facilities.(B) (i) No more than six months before the development of the methodology, the Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide to each council of governments a forecast of changes in enrollment levels at its campuses, including off-campus facilities, within the region, based on factors including, but not limited to, (I) cohort progression projections, (II) improvements in the percentage of California residents meeting university admission and transfer standards, and (III) improvements in degree completion by noncohort students. The forecast shall not be limited to students who will be recent high school graduates. The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide copies of the forecast to the Director of Finance, the Director of Housing and Community Development, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.(ii) Clause (i) shall apply to the seventh and each subsequent housing element cycle, except as specified in clause (iii).(iii) With respect to all of the following councils of governments, clause (i) shall apply to the eighth and each subsequent housing element cycles:(I) The Humboldt County Association of Governments.(II) The Lake Area Planning Council.(III) The Mendocino Council of Governments.(C) The Regents of the University of California are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University shall, provide trip and travel data to the council of governments upon request.(10) The housing needs of individuals and families experiencing homelessness. If a council of governments has surveyed each of its member jurisdictions pursuant to subdivision (b) on or before January 1, 2020, this paragraph shall apply only to the development of methodologies for the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element.(11) The loss of units during a state of emergency that was declared by the Governor pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2), during the planning period immediately preceding the relevant revision pursuant to Section 65588 that have yet to be rebuilt or replaced at the time of the analysis.(12) The region’s greenhouse gas emissions targets provided by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Section 65080.(13) The development pattern set forth in the region’s sustainable communities strategy of its regional transportation plan.(14) Any other factors adopted by the council of governments, that further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584, provided that the council of governments specifies which of the objectives each additional factor is necessary to further. The council of governments may include additional factors unrelated to furthering the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 so long as the additional factors do not undermine the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 and are applied equally across all household income levels as described in subdivision (f) of Section 65584 and the council of governments makes a finding that the factor is necessary to address significant health and safety conditions.(f) The council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall explain in writing how each of the factors described in subdivision (e) was incorporated into the methodology and how the methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. The methodology may include numerical weighting. This information, and any other supporting materials used in determining the methodology, shall be posted on the council of governments’, or delegate subregion’s, internet website.(g) The following criteria shall not be a justification for a determination or a reduction in a jurisdiction’s share of the regional housing need:(1) Any ordinance, policy, voter-approved measure, or standard of a city or county that directly or indirectly limits the number of residential building permits issued by a city or county.(2) Prior underproduction of housing in a city or county from the previous regional housing need allocation, as determined by each jurisdiction’s annual production report submitted pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 65400.(3) Stable population numbers in a city or county from the previous regional housing needs cycle.(h) Following the conclusion of the public comment period described in subdivision (d) on the proposed allocation methodology, and after making any revisions deemed appropriate by the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, as a result of comments received during the public comment period, and as a result of consultation with the department, each council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall publish a draft allocation methodology on its internet website and submit the draft allocation methodology, along with the information required pursuant to subdivision (e), to the department.(i) Within 60 days, the department shall review the draft allocation methodology and report its written findings to the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable. In its written findings the department shall determine whether the methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584. If the department determines that the methodology is not consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 65584, the council of governments, or delegate subregion, as applicable, shall take both of the following actions:(1) Revise the methodology, in consultation with the department, to further the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 within 45 days.(2) Receive department acceptance that the revised methodology furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584 and adopt a final regional, or subregional, housing need allocation methodology.(j) If the department’s findings are not available within the time limits set by subdivision (i), the council of governments, or delegate subregion, may act without them.(k) After taking action pursuant to subdivision (i), the council of governments, or delegate subregion, shall provide notice of the adoption of the methodology to the jurisdictions within the region, or delegate subregion, as applicable, and to the department, and shall publish the adopted allocation methodology, along with its resolution and any adopted written findings, on its internet website.(l) The department may, within 45 days, review the adopted methodology and report its findings to the council of governments, or delegate subregion.(m) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that housing planning be coordinated and integrated with the regional transportation plan. To achieve this goal, the allocation plan shall be informed by the development pattern included in the sustainable communities strategy.(2) (A) The final allocation plan shall ensure that the total regional housing need, by income category, as determined under Section 65584, is maintained, and that each jurisdiction in the region receive an allocation of units for low- and very low income households.(B) For the seventh and subsequent revisions of the housing element, the allocation to each region required under subparagraph (A) shall also include an allocation of units for acutely low and extremely low income households.(3) The resolution approving the final housing need allocation plan shall demonstrate that the plan is informed by the sustainable communities strategy in the regional transportation plan and furthers the objectives listed in subdivision (d) of Section 65584.(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.(o) For the seventh housing element cycle, the changes to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall not apply to councils of governments with a housing element revision due date during the 2027 calendar year.SEC. 5. Section 21080.091 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.091. The University of California and the California State University are not required to conduct a “no project” alternative analysis described in subdivision (e) of Section 15126.6 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations in an environmental impact report, a supplemental environmental impact report, or an addendum for a development project, for which the University of California or the California State University, respectively, is the lead agency, if all of the following conditions are met:(a) The lead agency finds that the development project is necessary to achieve the campus’ share of the enrollment goals set forth in Section 66002 of the Education Code. (b) The University of California or the California State University, respectively, has provided the forecast of changes in enrollment levels for purposes of developing the most recent proposed methodology that allocates regional housing needs pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (e) of Section 65584.04 of the Government Code.(c) One of the following conditions is satisfied:(1) The development project is consistent with Section 67504 of the Education Code and Section 21080.09 of this code.(2) The development project is deemed by the applicable transportation planning agency designated under Sections 29532 and 29532.1 of the Government Code as consistent with the use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the area of the development project in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy, for which the State Air Resources Board has accepted the metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets established by the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code. The written determination that the project is consistent shall be submitted by the metropolitan planning organization.SEC. 6. (a) Section 3.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 65584.01 of the Government Code proposed by this bill, Senate Bill 233, Assembly Bill 650, and Assembly Bill 1275. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) this bill and one, two, or all of the other bills, Senate Bill 233, Assembly Bill 650, and Assembly Bill 1275, are enacted, and those enacted bills become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each enacted bill amends Section 65584.01 of the Government Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after each of the other enacted bills, in which case Section 3 of this bill shall not become operative.(b) Section 4.1 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 65584.04 of the Government Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 650. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 65584.04 of the Government Code, (3) Assembly Bill 1275 is not enacted or as enacted does not amend that section, and (4) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 650, in which case Sections 4, 4.2, and 4.3 of this bill shall not become operative.(c) Section 4.2 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 65584.04 of the Government Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 1275. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 65584.04 of the Government Code, (3) Assembly Bill 650 is not enacted or as enacted does not amend that section, and (4) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 1275 in which case Sections 4, 4.1, and 4.3 of this bill shall not become operative.(d) Section 4.3 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 65584.04 of the Government Code proposed by this bill, Assembly Bill 650, and Assembly Bill 1275. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) all three bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) all three bills amend Section 65584.04 of the Government Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 650 and Assembly Bill 1275, in which case Sections 4, 4.1, and 4.2 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 7. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.